test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-Clex_taassas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - táássáš: # MLO, ok
    táássáš+A+Sg+Nom: táássáš             
    táássáš+A+Sg+Gen: tássáá
    táássáš+A+Sg+Acc: tássáá
    táássáš+A+Sg+Ill: táásážân
    táássáš+A+Sg+Loc: tássáást
    táássáš+A+Sg+Com: tássáin
    táássáš+A+Sg+Abe: tássááttáá
    táássáš+A+Ess: táásážin                
    táássáš+A+Par: táásážid                
    táássáš+A+Pl+Nom: tássááh
    táássáš+A+Pl+Gen: tássái
    táássáš+A+Pl+Acc: tássáid
    táássáš+A+Pl+Ill: tássáid
    táássáš+A+Pl+Loc: tássáin
    táássáš+A+Pl+Com: [tássáiguin, tássáigijn]
#    táássáš+A+Pl+Com: tássáiguin
    táássáš+A+Pl+Abe: tássáittáá
